Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.390

Comprehensive plan—Notice of hearing.

Notice of the time, place and purpose of any public hearing shall be given by one publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the county and in the official gazette, if any, of the county, at least ten days before the hearing.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.70.390. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 39.]